Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-502
Session laws and journals; distribution by county clerk to judges, county officers, and county law library; section, termination.

The county clerk shall distribute one copy of the session laws to the clerk of the district court for the use of the district court in all counties of the state except Lancaster and Douglas Counties, and in those counties one copy for each district judge in the county, to the judge of the county court, to the county attorney, and to the county law library. The county clerk shall also reserve one copy each of the laws and journals for the county clerk's own use and give one copy to each clerk magistrate in the county.

This section terminates on January 1, 2027.

Laws 1907, c. 78, § 3, p. 290;

R.S.1913, § 3734;

C.S.1922, § 3127;

C.S.1929, § 49-502;

R.S.1943, § 49-502;

Laws 1957, c. 210, § 2, p. 743;

Laws 1963, c. 303, § 2, p. 897;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 253;

Laws 1975, LB 59, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 81;

Laws 2026, LB1236, § 4.
July 18, 2026